South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-3-835.  A guardian ad litem is prohibited from engaging in ex parte communications with a party's attorney regarding a case, except for administrative, nonsubstantive purposes, unless the other party's attorney has provided consent. A guardian ad litem must provide a copy of any written communication with an attorney for one of the parties to the other party's attorney; provided, however, if a party is not represented by an attorney, the guardian ad litem must provide the written communication directly to the other party. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----